src/morphology/stems/genitive_attributes.lexc
LEXICON GenitiveAttributes
kreeka+N+Sg+Gen:kreeka # ;
soomõ-ugri+N+Sg+Gen:soomõ-ugri # ;
lõunaeesti+N+Sg+Gen:lõunaeesti # ;
indoõuruupa+N+Sg+Gen:indoõuruupa # ;
roodsi+N+Sg+Gen:roodsi # ;
sanskriti+N+Sg+Gen:sanskriti # ;
jaapani+N+Sg+Gen:jaapani # ;
põh́asaami+N+Sg+Gen:põh́asaami # ;
põh́aeesti+N+Sg+Gen:põh́aeesti # ;
